apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="vilk/en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/som__prn"> <!-- This needs to be checked probably -->
  <e>       <p><l>som</l>       <r>som<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vars</l>      <r>som<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vilkas</l>    <r>som<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="själv__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eg/en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

<pardef n="övrig__adj">  <!-- This is broken, should be det.ind, but then we have problems in transfer -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="fri__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>asta</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aste</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ång__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ång</l>       <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ångt</l>      <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånge</l>      <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånga</l>      <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånga</l>      <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ängre</l>     <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ängst</l>     <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ängsta</l>    <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ängste</l>    <r>ång<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ung__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungt</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unga</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unga</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>yngre</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngst</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngsta</l>    <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngste</l>    <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/gammal__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>gammal</l>    <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gammalt</l>   <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gamle</l>     <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gamla</l>     <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gamla</l>     <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>äldre</l>     <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äldst</l>     <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äldsta</l>    <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äldste</l>    <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/god__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>god</l>       <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gott</l>      <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gode</l>      <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>goda</l>      <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>goda</l>      <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>godare</l>    <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>godast</l>    <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>godaste</l>   <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>bättre</l>    <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>bäst</l>      <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>bästa</l>     <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>bäste</l>     <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="fri"><i>fri</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gammal"><i></i><par n="/gammal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="god"><i></i><par n="/god__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rå"><i>rå</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lång"><i>l</i><par n="l/ång__adj"/></e>
<e lm="medellång"><i>medell</i><par n="l/ång__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ny"><i>ny</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="själv"><i>själv</i><par n="själv__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ung"><i></i><par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
<e lm="livslång"><i>livsl</i><par n="l/ång__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tung"><i>t</i><par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vilken">          <i>vilk</i><par n="vilk/en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="själv">           <i>själv</i><par n="själv__prn"/></e>
<e lm="egen">            <i>eg</i><par n="eg/en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="som">             <i></i><par n="/som__prn"/></e>
<e lm="övrig">           <i>övrig</i><par n="övrig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lång">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ång__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fri">             <i>fri</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rå">              <i>rå</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ny">              <i>ny</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gammal">          <i></i><par n="/gammal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="god">             <i></i><par n="/god__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ung">             <i></i><par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
